Massachusetts, session 194th, H4048.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 231 the
following section:-
Section 231A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term ''surgical intensive care unit''
shall mean an intensive care unit, as defined in 105 CMR 130.020, within a hospital operated by
the commonwealth, that specializes in post-surgical care.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in all surgical intensive
care units, hospital staff and visitors shall wear medical or surgical masks when in rooms or
areas where a patient is present. The hospital shall post conspicuous signage to inform visitors of
this requirement.
(c) The health policy commission shall promulgate any regulations necessary to
implement this section.
of 1